Hawaii, session 2025, SB15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 6E-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "historic property" to read as follows: ""Historic property" means any building, structure, object, district, area, or site, including heiau and underwater site[, which is] that: (1)  Is over fifty years old[.]; (2)  Meets the criteria for being entered into the Hawaii register of historic places; or (3)  Has important value to Native Hawaiians or other ethnic groups of the State due to: (A)  Associations with cultural practices once carried out, or still carried out, at the property; or (B)  Associations with traditional beliefs, events, or oral accounts that are important to history, traditional practices, and cultural identity." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________